Florida, session 2026, SB500.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSection 99.122, Florida Statutes, is created to 12 read: 13 99.122âProtective security detail for nominees and 14 officers-elect.â 15 (1)âImmediately upon the adjournment of the meeting of the 16 Elections Canvassing Commission certifying the results of the 17 primary election under s. 102.111, the Department of Law 18 Enforcement must provide a protective security detail to all 19 nominees of a political party, other than the nominees of a 20 minor political party as defined in s. 97.021(20), to the 21 following offices: 22 (a)âThe Governor. 23 (b)âThe Lieutenant Governor. 24 (c)âA cabinet officer. 25 (2)âThe protective security detail must be provided 26 immediately upon the adjournment of the meeting of the Elections 27 Canvassing Commission certifying the results of the primary 28 election under s. 102.111 until the relevant nominee concedes 29 the general election or upon adjournment of the meeting of the 30 Elections Canvassing Commission certifying the results of the 31 general election under s. 102.111, whichever is earlier. The 32 Department of Law Enforcement must continue to provide a 33 protective security detail to the officers-elect until the 34 officers-elect assume office. 35 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.